New York, session 2025-2026, A2432.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 8 and 9 of section 780 of the labor law as 2 added by a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the labor law relating 3 to establishing the warehouse worker injury reduction program, as 4 proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 5081-C and A. 8907-A, are 5 amended to read as follows: 6 8. "[Musculoskeletal injuries and] Work-related musculoskeletal disor- 7 ders" means [work related] work-related conditions (injuries, illness or 8 disorders[,]) of the muscles, nerves, tendons, ligaments, joints, carti- 9 lage of the body's musculoskeletal system including the muscles, nerves, 10 tendons, ligaments, joints, cartilage and spinal discs of the upper and 11 lower limbs, neck, shoulders, and [lower] back [(including spinal 12 discs)] that: (a) [are caused by sudden or sustained physical exertion] 13 are the result of an exposure in the work environment during the 14 performance of work that either causes or contributes significantly to 15 the resulting condition or makes worse or longer-lasting a pre-existing 16 condition; (b) are caused by ergonomic risk factors that include, but 17 are not limited to, rapid pace, forceful exertions, extreme or static 18 postures, repetitive motions, direct pressure, contact stress, vibration 19 or cold temperatures; or [(b)] (c) are not the result of any instantane- 20 ous non-exertion event, such as slips, trips, or falls. 21 9. ["Qualified ergonomist" means an ergonomist who is able to demon- 22 strate proficiency in the core, minimum competencies of ergonomics and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02852-01-5 A. 2432 2 1 injury prevention, as defined by the commissioner. Until the commission- 2 er defines such competencies and approves ergonomists in accordance with 3 such competencies, consultants approved by the commissioner under 12 4 NYCRR 59 and 60 with a credential as a certified safety professional or 5 certified industrial hygienist shall be deemed to qualify as an ergonom- 6 ist] "Competent person" shall mean one capable of performing a job 7 hazard assessment to identify and assess existing and predictable ergo- 8 nomic risk factors in work activities that are a core element of an 9 employee's job or a significant part of the workday that are harmful to 10 employees and reasonably likely to cause or contribute to musculoskele- 11 tal disorders. A competent person shall include ergonomists, industrial 12 hygienists, certified safety professionals, or other health and safety 13 professionals who, by possession of a recognized advanced academic 14 degree, certificate, or professional standing or who by extensive know- 15 ledge, training, and experience has successfully demonstrated the abili- 16 ty to manage workplace injury risk. 17 § 2. Section 789 of the labor law, as added by a chapter of the laws 18 of 2024 amending the labor law relating to establishing the warehouse 19 worker injury reduction program, as proposed in legislative bills 20 numbers S. 5081-C and A. 8907-A, is amended to read as follows: 21 § 789. Injury reduction program. 1. Every employer subject to this 22 section shall establish and implement an injury reduction program 23 designed to identify and minimize the risks of work-related musculosk- 24 eletal [injuries and] disorders among workers involved in performing 25 manual materials handling tasks. The program shall include: worksite 26 evaluation; control of exposures, including ergonomic risk factors such 27 as pace, which have caused or have the potential to cause work-related 28 musculoskeletal [injuries and] disorders; employee training; on-site 29 medical and first aid practices; and employee involvement. 30 2. The employer shall ensure that each job, process, shift or opera- 31 tion of work activity covered by this section or a representative number 32 of such jobs, processes, shifts or operations of identical work activ- 33 ities shall be addressed by its injury reduction program. Unless other- 34 wise exempted under this act, the employer shall have a written work 35 site evaluation by a [qualified ergonomist] competent person for risk 36 factors which have or are likely to cause work-related musculoskeletal 37 [injuries and] disorders. Such risk factors shall include, but are not 38 limited to, rapid pace, forceful exertions, [repetitive motions, twist- 39 ing, bending, and awkward postures and combinations thereof] extreme or 40 static postures, repetitive motions, direct pressure, contact stress, 41 vibration, or cold temperatures that had caused or are likely to cause 42 work-related musculoskeletal [injuries and] disorders. 43 (a) Any worksite evaluations shall also determine whether any employ- 44 ees exposed to such risk factors are subject to either personnel action 45 with the potential for adverse action, or adverse action or termination 46 themselves, arising in whole or in part from an employer's use of quotas 47 to determine employee assignments. 48 (b) All such worksite evaluations shall [obtain recommendations] 49 incorporate input from workers who regularly perform those jobs, either 50 directly or through an employee-led workplace safety committee, on the 51 possible risk factors and any workplace changes that can reduce such 52 risk factors. 53 (c) Copies of such worksite [risk factor] evaluations shall be made 54 available to workers and their representatives upon request, at no cost, 55 within one business day of such request. Workers and their represen- 56 tatives shall be notified in writing of the results of the worksite A. 2432 3 1 evaluation. Employers shall maintain accessible copies of such evalu- 2 ations at locations within the warehouse and shall make such copies 3 readily available to workers. 4 (d) An initial worksite evaluation shall be conducted. Worksite eval- 5 uations shall be reviewed and updated at least annually. A new analysis 6 of risk factors shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of 7 subdivision one of this section whenever a new job, process, or opera- 8 tion is introduced which could increase the risk factors for work-relat- 9 ed musculoskeletal [injuries and] disorders. Such new analysis shall be 10 conducted within thirty days of the creation or change of a job, process 11 or operation. 12 (e) [The commissioner shall form a task force chaired by a recognized 13 academic leader in the field of ergonomics in New York state and includ- 14 ing, but not limited to, representatives from the warehouse workforce, 15 labor organizations active in the warehousing industry, and employers in 16 the industry, to recommend the core competencies required for the 17 certification of qualified ergonomists, as well as standardized worksite 18 evaluations and controls. 19 (f) The commissioner shall adopt a standard and process for certifying 20 qualified ergonomists, as well as standardized worksite evaluations and 21 controls, based on the recommendations of the task force] A worksite 22 evaluation must be reviewed by a board certified ergonomist when an 23 employee-led workplace safety committee makes a written request to the 24 employer based upon a material concern related to the findings of a 25 competent person. Where there is no active employee-led workplace safety 26 committee, a worksite evaluation must be reviewed by a board certified 27 ergonomist when any employee-led committee makes a formal recommendation 28 based upon a material concern related to the findings of a competent 29 person. 30 3. The employer shall correct in a timely manner any risk factors 31 identified as having caused or being likely to cause work-related muscu- 32 loskeletal [injuries and] disorders. For any corrections which require 33 more than thirty days to complete, the employer shall revise, as needed, 34 and provide a schedule for such proposed corrections. Such schedule 35 shall be included in the evaluations provided to workers and their 36 representatives. 37 (a) Where the employer demonstrates that it is unable to eliminate 38 identified risk factors, the employer shall minimize the exposures to 39 the extent feasible. 40 (b) In reducing risk factors, the employer shall consider: 41 (i) engineering controls and redesigning work stations to change 42 shelving heights, provide adjustable fixtures or tool redesign; and 43 (ii) administrative controls, such as job rotation which reduces the 44 exposure to risk factors, reduced work pacing or additional work breaks. 45 (c) Employers shall maintain records of steps taken to eliminate or 46 reduce risk factors and shall make copies available to workers and their 47 representatives upon request. 48 4. All employers covered by this section shall provide injury 49 reduction training to all employees involved in performing manual mate- 50 rials handling jobs and tasks at the warehouse during normal work hours 51 and without suffering a loss of pay. Such training shall be provided in 52 a language and vocabulary that the workers understand and shall be 53 repeated annually. The training shall also be provided to the workers' 54 supervisors. Such training shall be in addition to [the] any training 55 [required under] received in accordance with section twenty-seven-d of 56 this chapter and shall include: A. 2432 4 1 (a) The early symptoms of work-related musculoskeletal [injuries and] 2 disorders and the importance of early detection; 3 (b) Musculoskeletal [injury and] disorder ergonomic risk factors and 4 exposures at work, including the hazards posed by excessive rates of 5 work; 6 (c) Methods to reduce risk factors for musculoskeletal [injuries and] 7 disorders, including both engineering controls and administrative 8 controls, such as limitations on work pace and increased scheduled and 9 unscheduled breaks; 10 (d) The employer's program to identify risk factors as required under 11 this section and prevent work-related musculoskeletal [injuries and] 12 disorders, including the summary protocols for medical treatment 13 approved by the employer's medical consultant; 14 (e) The rights and function of workplace safety committees established 15 under section twenty-seven-d of this chapter and the rights of employees 16 to report any risk factors, other hazards, injuries or health and safety 17 concerns; and 18 (f) Training on the unlawful retaliation of any provision in this 19 section, including [the] a reference to the employer's policy requiring 20 disciplinary actions [required] when supervisors or managers violate the 21 law or policy, as well as the employer's policy prohibiting any work- 22 place discrimination. 23 5. Any on-site [medical office or first aid station] location that 24 [sees] staffs a medical professional to treat workers in warehouses 25 covered by this section [with] for symptoms of work-related musculosk- 26 eletal [injuries and] disorders shall be staffed with medical profes- 27 sionals operating within their legal scope of practice. Nothing in this 28 section shall infringe on the rights of workers under the opening para- 29 graph of subdivision (a) of section thirteen of the workers' compen- 30 sation law to either select an authorized physician to treat employees 31 and render medical care or to select the continuance of any medical 32 treatment or care by an authorized physician selected by the employee. 33 All examinations and treatments by any medical personnel employed or 34 selected by the employer under section seven hundred eighty-one of this 35 article shall be performed for the purposes of the injury reduction 36 program and shall not interfere with the rights of employees to receive 37 any medical treatment or any other benefits under the workers' compen- 38 sation law. 39 (a) Employers shall ensure that staffing and the practice of any first 40 aid or medical station meets state requirements for physician super- 41 vision of nurses, emergency medical technicians or other non-physician 42 personnel. 43 (b) In all warehouses with on-site medical or first aid providers for 44 the treatment of work-related musculoskeletal [injuries and] disorders, 45 the employer shall consult with a medical consultant who is licensed by 46 New York state and board certified in occupational medicine. 47 (i) The employer shall obtain from the medical consultant a written 48 evaluation of the on-site medical or first aid provider program and 49 protocols followed in the warehouse for identification and treatment of 50 work-related musculoskeletal [injuries and] disorders and shall include 51 recommendations to ensure compliance with accepted medical practice of 52 the staffing, supervision and documentation of medical treatment proto- 53 cols. 54 (ii) The employer shall obtain from the medical consultant a summary 55 of treatment protocols suitable for worker patients covering all aspects 56 of the on-site medical and first aid practices, from early detection of A. 2432 5 1 work-related musculoskeletal [injuries and] disorders through evaluation 2 by a qualified physician and physician provision of appropriate work 3 restrictions in languages understood by the employees. 4 (iii) The employer shall ensure that the medical consultant reviews 5 the previous medical consultant evaluation, related materials and proto- 6 cols on an annual basis, and recommends changes as appropriate. 7 (iv) The employer shall ensure that all designated medical and first 8 aid providers have observed, in person, the jobs involving manual mate- 9 rials handling within the warehouse and all risk factors identified in 10 the evaluation conducted under the medical consultant evaluation. 11 (c) There shall be no delays in the provision of adequate medical care 12 to workers who report injuries to the on-site medical services. 13 (d) Each employer shall ensure that no supervisory or managerial 14 employee or other person discriminates or retaliates against any 15 current, former, or prospective employee or other person for reporting a 16 work-related injury or illness, or health and safety concern. 17 6. Employers shall ensure that employees and their designated repre- 18 sentatives are consulted both before and during the development and 19 implementation of all aspects of the program. Where employees have 20 established a workplace safety committee in compliance with section 21 twenty-seven-d of this chapter, the employer shall ensure that the 22 committee is consulted regarding the development and implementation of 23 all aspects of the injury reduction program. Any record created by the 24 employer according to this section shall be provided to the workplace 25 safety committee prior to consultation. All ergonomic safety documents 26 provided to employees shall be provided in writing in English and in the 27 language identified by each employee as the primary language of such 28 employee. If, prior to the effective date of this section, an employer 29 has formed workplace safety committees in the State of New York through 30 collective bargaining that is currently active, and continuously main- 31 tains such safety committees in conjunction with an injury prevention 32 program that fully complies with the federal Occupational Safety and 33 Health Act, then such employer may instead allow an employee-led work- 34 place safety committee to review or conduct any worksite evaluations 35 performed by a competent person. Such injury prevention program must be 36 reviewed by a board certified ergonomist where an employee-led workplace 37 safety committee makes a written request to the employer based upon a 38 material concern related to the findings of a competent person. Where 39 there is no active employee-led workplace safety committee, a worksite 40 evaluation must be reviewed by a board certified ergonomist when any 41 employee-led committee makes a written request to the employer based 42 upon a material concern related to the findings of a competent person. 43 Such review must be commenced within thirty days of receipt of such 44 written request. Copies of revised or new worksite evaluations shall be 45 made available to workers and their representatives, at no cost, upon 46 request upon completion of such worksite evaluation. 47 § 3. Section 7 of a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the labor law 48 relating to establishing the warehouse worker injury reduction program, 49 as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 5081-C and A. 8907-A, is 50 amended to read as follows: 51 § 7. This act shall take effect on June 1, 2025[; provided, however 52 that paragraph (d) of subdivision 2 of section 789 of the labor law as 53 added by section five of this act shall take effect on the one hundred 54 eightieth day after it shall have become a law; provided further, howev- 55 er, that paragraph (e) of subdivision 2 of section 789 of the labor law 56 as added by section five of this act shall take effect on the sixtieth A. 2432 6 1 day after it shall have become a law; and provided further, however, 2 that paragraph (f) of subdivision 2 and subdivisions 4 and 5 of section 3 789 of the labor law as added by section five of this act shall take 4 effect on the sixtieth day after it shall have become a law]. 5 § 4. Severability. If any provision of this act, or any application of 6 any provision of this act, is held to be invalid, that shall not affect 7 the validity or effectiveness of any other provision of this act, or of 8 any other application of any provision of this act, which can be given 9 effect without that provision or application; and to that end, the 10 provisions and applications of this act are severable. 11 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately; provided however, that 12 sections one and two of this act shall take effect on the same date and 13 in the same manner as a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the labor 14 law relating to establishing the warehouse worker injury reduction 15 program, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 5081-C and A. 16 8907-A, takes effect.